District of Columbia statutes.
32-1102

Applicability to employment in workplaces.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this chapter shall apply to employment performed in any workplace in the District.

(b)

This chapter shall not apply to the premises of an establishment of the United States government unless the physical premises are controlled by an independent contractor.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to working conditions of employees whose occupational safety and health is protected by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 (42 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.), or with respect to which the United States government exercises exclusive jurisdiction for purposes of occupational safety and health.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 3, 35 DCR 8250

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1124.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1202.

Editor's Notes

Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.